Utah, session 2026, HB154.
Section 1. Section 63I-2-273 is amended to read:63I-2-273Effective 05/06/26Superseded 07/01/26. Repeal dates: Title 73.ReservedSection 73-10-32.7, Study regarding water losses, is repealed July 1, 2027.

Section 2:
Section 2. Section 63I-2-273 is amended to read:63I-2-273Effective 07/01/26. Repeal dates: Title 73.(1)Section 73-10-32.7, Study regarding water losses, is repealed July 1, 2027.(2)Subsection 73-10g-607(5), regarding a requirement to report to an interim committee, is repealed January 1, 2027.

Section 3:
Section 3. Section 73-10-32.7 is enacted to read:73-10-32.7Effective 05/06/26. Study regarding water losses.(1)As used in this section:(a)"Division" means the Division of Water Resources.(b)"Public water system" means the same as that term is defined in Section 19-4-102.(2)The division shall, in conjunction with the Division of Drinking Water, conduct a study regarding water loss by public water systems under which the division shall:(a)compile and analyze water loss estimates based on system size from data provided by a public water system for the period beginning January 1, 2015, and ending December 31, 2024;(b)provide an overview of industry standard water loss principles and practices, including for both public system and end use water losses; and(c)make recommendations on how to:(i)improve water loss estimates and associated data reliability; and(ii)reduce actual water losses.(3)The division shall report the division's findings under the study described in Subsection (2) to the Legislative Water Development Commission by no later than October 31, 2026.

Section 4:
Section 4.  Effective Date.(1)Except as provided in Subsection (2), this bill takes effect May 6, 2026.(2)The actions affecting Section 63I-2-273 Effective 07/01/26 take effect on July 1, 2026.